Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.654

Actions by conservator—Review.

During the period of conservatorship, the credit union may request the director to review an action taken or proposed to be taken by the conservator, specifying how the action is not in the best interest of the credit union. The request stays the action, pending the director's review of the request.

[ 1997 c 397 s 65.]